Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201646-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 46-1101 to 46-1148 shall be known and may be cited
as the Nebraska Chemigation Act.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1046, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB272, § 1.